Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 4
COLORADO FAMILY SUPPORT LOAN FUND

25.5-10-401. Legislative declaration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1785, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (HB 17-1078), ch. 27, p. 81, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 27-10.5-501 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-402. Colorado family support loan fund - creation - loans to families - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1785, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2017:

(6) added, (HB 17-1078), ch. 27, p. 81, § 2, effective July 1.

25.5-10-403. Duties relating to the fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1786, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (HB 17-1078), ch. 27, p. 81, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 27-10.5-503 as it existed prior to 2013.